District of Columbia statutes.
48-101

Possession or disposition of adulterated articles prohibited.

No person shall, within the District of Columbia, by himself or by his servant or agent, or as the servant or agent of any other person, sell, exchange, or deliver, or have in his custody or possession with the intent to sell or exchange, or expose or offer for sale or exchange, any article of food or drug which is adulterated within the meaning of this chapter.

Feb. 17, 1898, 30 Stat. 246, ch. 25, § 1
1981 Ed., § 33-101.
1973 Ed., § 33-101.